test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-minemae78_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - minemä: # Verb (78) `saama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     minemä+V+Inf/mA: minemä
     minemä+V+Inf: minnäq
     minemä+V+Act+PrfPrc: lännüq
     minemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [mint, mintü]

     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lää
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [läät, läädeq]
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lätt
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: läämiq
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: läätiq
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [lääväq, lätväq]
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: lää
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lätsi
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [lätsit, lätsiq, lätsideq]
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lätsʼ
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lätsimiq
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lätsitiq, lätsideq]
     minemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lätsiq, lätsiväq]

     minemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mindäs

     minemä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: minnev

     minemä+V+Jus: minkuq
